Louisiana, session 2026, SB208.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 29:296(H) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 29:296(B)(4),
(F)(3), (I), and (J) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§296. Preserving lawful utilization of services for veterans
* * *
B.(1) * * *
(4) No person shall receive compensation for any services rendered in
connection with any claim for a veteran that has never received a disability
rating.
* * *
F. Businesses engaging in the preparation of an initial claim or appeal of a
disability rating for a fee shall not do any of the following:
Page 1 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-471 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 208
* * *
(3) Charge a fee for the termination of any contract or agreement, except
for those fees charged for actual work performed prior to the request for
termination.
* * *
H. A private right of action shall exist for a veteran against any person
who collected or intended to collect a fee from the veteran in connection with
any contract or agreement where the person's negligent or reckless conduct
caused a reduction of a disability rating, a denial of benefits, or a delay causing
economic loss.
(1) A successful right of action shall be entitled to actual damages, lost
retroactive benefits, diminished monthly compensation, and attorney fees.
(2) A successful action shall be entitled to treble damages for intentional
misconduct.
H. I. An entity assisting veterans with their initial disability claims as
prescribed within this Section shall, within one hundred twenty days of the request,
provide on an annualized basis of all of the following data to the Department of
Veterans Affairs:
(1) Aggregate number of serviced in the state.
(2) Number of claims approved, denied, and pending.
(3) Average claim return time.
(4) Number of clients who received a successful increase who have a
previously assigned "agent of record".
(5) Data provided shall exclude any items of personal financial, medical, or
other data deemed confidential, business privileged, or HIPAA protected
information.
J. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to regulate accredited
agents, attorneys, or representatives as defined in 38 CFR 14.627 or
representation before the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs.
Page 2 of 4
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-471 ENGROSSED
SB NO. 208